Utah statutes.
41-6a-701.   Duty to operate vehicle on right side of roadway -- Exceptions.
(1)  On all roadways of sufficient width, a person operating a vehicle shall
operate the vehicle on the right half of the roadway, except:
(a)  when overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same
direction under the rules governing that movement;
(b)  when an obstruction requires operating the vehicle to the left of the
center of the roadway subject to the provisions of Subsection (2);
(c)  on a roadway divided into three marked lanes for traffic under the
applicable rules; or
(d)  on a roadway designed and signposted for one-way traffic.
(2)  A person operating a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to a vehicle:
(a)  traveling in the proper direction on a roadway; and
(b)  that is within a distance constituting an immediate hazard.
(3)  A person operating a vehicle on a roadway at less than the normal speed
of traffic shall operate the vehicle in the right-hand lane then available for
traffic, or as close as practicable to the right-hand curb or edge of the
roadway, except when:
(a)  overtaking and passing another vehicle proceeding in the same direction;
(b)  preparing to turn left; or
(c)  taking a different highway or an exit on the left.
